Alabama, session 2026rs, HB467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-26A-60 of the Code of Alabama
1975, is amended to read as follows:
"§45-26A-60
(a) There is hereby established a school board for the
City of Tallassee, Alabama, which board shall be called the
Tallassee Board of Education. The members of such board shall
be elected by vote of the qualified electors of the City of
Tallassee, Alabama, as hereinafter provided in this section.
The board shall be composed of seven members, with one member
of such the board being elected from each of seven school
districts as defined in subsection (b).
(b) The school districts from which such board members
are to be elected shall be geographically identical to the
districts from which the council members of the City of
Tallassee are elected. In the event the boundaries of a city
council district should be changed for any reason, the
boundaries of the corresponding school board district within
the City of Tallassee shall automatically change accordingly
without the necessity of further action by the Legislature.
(c) Candidates for each place on such the board of
education shall be at least 21 years of age, residents of the
Page 1

education shall be at least 21 years of age, residents of the
HB467 Enrolled
school board district which they seek to represent on such
board for at least 90 consecutive days prior to the deadline
date for qualifying as a candidate, and shall not have a
record of conviction for any crime involving moral turpitude.
At the time of qualifying, each candidate for each place on
such the board shall pay such a qualifying fee as shall be
prescribed by the City Council of Tallassee, Alabama, not
later than six months prior to the qualifying deadline as
provided by law. Provided, however, that the qualification fee
for the first elections to be held for the board created by
this section shall be twenty-five dollars ($25) for each
candidate.
(d) Elected school board members shall serve for
four-year terms with the elections and terms thereof
coinciding with those of the members of the City Council of
Tallassee, Alabama. The initial elections for elected board
members shall be held no later than 90 days next following
July 22, 1992. The initially elected board members shall serve
from the date on which they are sworn into office until the
swearing in of their successors next following the next
regularly scheduled city council and school board elections.
Terms of office for the initially elected board members shall
terminate on the first Monday of October 1992, at noon or at
such time as their duly elected successors are sworn in
subsequent to the first Monday of October 1992. Members of the
board shall serve without compensation.
(e) In the event a vacancy occurs in the office of
members of the city board of education, the vacancy shall be
Page 2

members of the city board of education, the vacancy shall be
HB467 Enrolled
filled by appointment by a majority of the remaining members
of the city board of education, and the appointee shall hold
for the unexpired term. In the event the vacancy is not filled
by the remaining members of the city board within 30 days, the
State Superintendent of Education shall fill such vacancy by
appointment. The city superintendent of education shall notify
the State Superintendent of Education when a vacancy in the
office of a member of the city board of education has not been
filled within 30 days.
(f) In the event no candidate receives a majority of
all of the votes cast for anyone one or more positions on such
the school board, the city council shall order a runoff
election to be held separately or in conjunction with any
scheduled primary, special, or general election, at which
election the two candidates receiving the most votes for the
office in the initial election shall be the only candidates.
The candidate receiving the most votes in such the runoff
election shall be declared as to be elected. In the event of a
tie vote between such the runoff candidates, the then serving
city council shall decide the election by majority vote at a
special meeting called for such purpose by the council's
presiding officer.
(g) All members of the board created by this section
shall represent the interests of any student of the city
school system who is not otherwise represented by a certain
district school board member as provided for in this section.
(h) Such board of education shall have the financial
records of the Tallassee School System audited at least
Page 3

records of the Tallassee School System audited at least
HB467 Enrolled
annually by an independent auditing firm with the results of
such audit being a matter of public record.
(i) The members of such board shall have such powers,
authority, duties, and responsibilities as are otherwise
provided by law for members of boards of education as set
forth in Chapter 11 of Title 16. The new board of education
elected under this section shall assume all of the
responsibilities, contracts, obligations, and liabilities of
the former board of education. Provided further, such The new
board shall assume ownership of any and all assets of such the
former board.
(j)(1) In accordance with Section 16-1-26(a), upon
approval by a majority vote of the board at the Tallassee City
Board of Education's annual meeting, each board member shall
receive reasonable compensation for his or her services in the
100 form of an expense allowance. The amount shall be set by a
101 majority of the members of the Tallassee City Board of
102 Education, not to exceed nine hundred dollars ($900) per
103 month, in addition to any actual travel and necessary expenses
104 incurred in attending meetings and transacting business of the
105 board. The expense allowance provided by this subsection shall
106 become effective on the first day of the month following
107 approval by the board.
108 (2) Commencing with the next term of office beginning
109 after June 1, 2026, and thereafter, the expense allowance
110 provided for in subdivision (1) shall be converted to a salary
111 for all members of the board.
112 (3) The compensation provided by this subsection shall
Page 4

(3) The compensation provided by this subsection shall
HB467 Enrolled
113 be subject to the requirements set forth in Section 16-1-26(d)
114 and Section 16-1-41.1(d)."
115 Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
116 2026.
Page 5

2026.
HB467 Enrolled
117
118
119
120
121
122
123
124
125
126
127 ________________________________________________
128 Speaker of the House of Representatives
129
130
131
132 ________________________________________________
133 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
134
135
136 House of Representatives
137
138 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
139 was passed by the House 24-Feb-26.
140
141 John Treadwell
142 Clerk
143
144
145
146
147
148 Senate 26-Feb-26 Passed
149
150
151
Page 6